Massachusetts, session 194th, H3513.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 25 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 24. (a) Every applicant seeking a permit from the department for any project
shall, within 30 days of filing the application, notify the city or town in which the proposed
project will be located, to be known for the purposes of this section as the "host community", and
all abutting cities and towns of the proposed project application. Acceptable forms of notice shall
include email communication to the mayor and city council of the host community and all
abutting cities and the select board and town administrator or town manager of the host
community and all abutting towns. The words "Proposed Project Siting" shall appear in the
subject line of the notice email.
of 2

(b) The department shall send, within 60 days of receipt of any application for a permit or
approval of a proposed project, written notice to the mayor or town administrator or town
manager, city council or select board and the state representatives and state senators of the host
community and abutting cities and towns of the application for the proposed project. The written
notice pursuant to this subsection shall include the applicant name, address and contact
information and shall state the right of the public to give testimony on the project and shall
include instructions for participating in the public hearing, including the date, time and location
of the hearing.
(c) Any applicant for a permit or approval from the department shall appear as requested
at a public hearing convened by the legislative body of a host community or abutting city or
town to describe the proposed project. Failure to appear as requested shall be communicated by
the legislative body requesting the hearing and shall be grounds for the department to grant
intervenor status to any entity that was previously excluded from the meeting.
of 2